California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 association shall deduct 1 percent from the total amount handled in its daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools. The additional 1 percent shall be deposited into the Fair and Exposition Fund and is hereby appropriated for the purposes specified in Section 3204 of the Food and Agricultural Code, except as specified in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) A fair conducting a live racing meeting at a fair in the northern zone or a joint powers authority designated by a fair racing association in the northern zone involved in conducting live racing meetings at fairs in the northern zone may retain the funds described in subdivision (d) for the purposes of improving a fair enclosure, racetrack maintenance, safety at fairs, or other similar activities if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The administrative costs do not exceed 7.5 percent of the funds
 retained.

(B) An annual audit of the funds is conducted by an independent third party to ensure compliance with the law and approved standards and policies that shall be filed with the Department of Food and Agriculture, the board, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Governmental Organization.

(2) This subdivision shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 11.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.2.

(a) In addition to the amounts otherwise deducted pursuant to this chapter, a fair, or an association conducting its meeting pursuant to Section 19549.1, may deduct from the total amount handled in daily double, quinella, exacta, and other multiple wagering pools approved by the board up to 3 percent thereof to be distributed as additional commissions and purses in the current year of the fair meet. Of the amount deducted, if any, 52.5 percent shall be distributed as additional purses and 47.5 percent shall be distributed as additional
 commissions. From the amount distributed as thoroughbred purses, a sum equal to 0.07 percent of the total amount handled shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2.

(b) At least 30 days prior to the commencement of its meeting, the association shall file with the board a statement of the additional deduction to be made pursuant to subdivision (a). Except with the consent of the board, the amount of the deduction shall not be changed during the course of the meeting.

(c) From the amount deducted for quarter horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 25 percent thereof shall be paid as breeder premiums and owners’ and stallion awards as provided in Section 19617.7, shall be
 deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

(d) From the amount deducted for Arabian horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and thereafter shall be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8. The board shall designate the officially recognized organization representing Arabian horsemen to administer this subdivision and to distribute premiums. The organization may, with the approval of the board, make a deduction for expenses of up to, but not to exceed, 10 percent of the total awards fund.

(e) From the amount deducted for Appaloosa horse purses under subdivision (a), a sum
 equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be paid as breeder premiums and owners’ and stallion awards as provided in Section 19617.9, and shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9.

(f) Amounts distributed pursuant to this section are derived from owners’ purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a racing association and the organization representing horsemen may agree to reduce the portion deducted from the parimutuel pool for purses and commissions, provided that the change only affect funds available for purses and commissions.

(b) Any collective bargaining agreement that is premised in part on the amount of commissions earned shall continue to be calculated based on the amount of commissions that would have been earned
 had this section not become law.

(c) An agreement by a horsemen’s organization and a racing association to reduce the portion deducted from the parimutuel pool for purses and commissions is subject to the approval of the California Horse Racing Board, and may not be approved unless notice has been given to any labor organization that could be affected by the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and in addition to any amounts provided for purses by any other provision of this chapter, from the amount deposited with the official registering agency for distribution pursuant to Section 19617.2, the official registering agency shall make the following distributions as owners’ premiums:

(1) An amount equal to 20 percent of the winner’s share of the purse for a qualifying race, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19617, shall be distributed as an owner premium to the owner of a registered California-bred thoroughbred horse conceived by a registered eligible thoroughbred stallion, as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 19617, which finishes first in the race.

(2) An amount equal to 10 percent of the winner’s share of the purse for a qualifying race, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19617, shall be distributed as an owner premium to the owner of a registered California-bred thoroughbred horse that finishes first in the race and that was not conceived by a registered eligible thoroughbred stallion as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 19617, which finishes first in the race.

(b) The official
 registering agency shall develop a policy for the payment of owner premiums pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) in the event of a dead heat that involves one or more registered California-bred horses.

(c) From the amounts distributed as purses pursuant to this chapter, the organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of thoroughbred horsemen participating in racing meetings, at its discretion, may pay an owner’s premium for a qualifying race, as defined by the organization, to the owner of a registered California-bred thoroughbred that finishes first through fifth in the qualifying race. Notwithstanding the foregoing, these payments shall be not less than the amount of the total payments made by the organization in 1998, and the discretion accorded the organization pursuant to this subdivision shall be exercised on a statewide basis for all racing meetings.

(d) The organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of thoroughbred horsemen participating in racing meetings shall pay, from purse revenues generated, to the official registering agency for the purpose of the California-bred bonus program an amount equal to the amount determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 19617.2, not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000) annually, and that amount shall be used for California-bred incentive awards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   (AB 1578)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19614.6.

Notwithstanding Section 19614, any county fair in the central zone that conducted fair racing meetings prior to January 1, 1980, commencing with the 2006 racing season, may retain that portion of the license fee applicable to its live racing meeting that exceeds the amount of license fees paid during its 2004 live racing meeting for payment of a capital expense loan incurred for the purpose of improving its facilities for horse racing. The license fee retention shall be applicable only during the loan period, only in an amount equal to the loan payments, and only
 if all the moneys retained are used to pay off the loan for those capital expenses. Any portion of the license fee in excess of the amount needed to make loan payments pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fair and Exposition Fund. However, if after the effective date of this section, the rate of the license fee imposed on fairs is reduced, the county fair may retain that portion of the license fee applicable to its live racing meeting that exceeds the amount of the license fees that would have been paid on its 2004 live racing meeting at the reduced rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19615.

(a) The board shall provide a method for estimating the aggregate handle for each association’s proposed race meeting. Estimates may be revised during the course of the meeting. Based upon the estimate, each association shall pay its license fee weekly, and purses shall be reasonably allocated over the period of the association’s anticipated race meeting pursuant to a purse program developed by the association in consultation with the horsemen’s organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of racing meetings subject to approval of the board. 

(b) Within seven days after the close of a race meeting, an association shall pay any license fee theretofore unpaid, or shall have refunded to it any excess license fee theretofore paid. 

(c) If, at the close of a thoroughbred racing meeting, it is determined that the association conducting the meeting has not made payments to or for the benefit of owners and breeders of horses in an amount equaling the percentages set forth in this chapter, any excess shall be deducted from, and any deficiency not in excess of an amount agreed upon between the association and the horsemen’s organization contracting with the association with respect to the conduct of racing meetings shall be added to, the amount the association is required to pay to or for the benefit of owners and breeders of horses at its racing meeting in the following calendar year. Any deficiency in excess of the amount agreed
 upon shall be distributed as provided in the agreement. 

(d) If, at the close of any other racing meeting, it is determined that the association conducting the meeting has not made payments to or for the benefit of owners and breeders of horses in an amount equaling the percentages set forth in this chapter, any excess shall be deducted from, and any deficiency shall be added to, the amount the association is required to pay to or for the benefit of owners and breeders of horses at its racing meeting in the following calendar year. 

(e) Any two associations conducting a meeting pursuant to Section 19612 or 19612.6 may, with the approval of the board, combine their excesses or deficiencies from prior meetings if the associations and the organizations representing the horsemen all agree. 

(f) Any associations
 conducting a harness meeting in the northern zone, including an association conducting any meeting pursuant to Section 19549.3, may, with the approval of the board, combine their excesses or deficiencies from prior meetings if the associations and the organizations representing horsemen all agree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 139, Sec. 2.   Effective July 22, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

19616.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, wagers accepted on out-of-state or out-of-country races pursuant to Sections 19596 and 19596.2, or on any multiple race exotic wager involving out-of-state races that is designated as a national wager, but not included in the parimutuel pool or pools of the entity conducting the out-of-state or out-of-country racing, shall be placed in a separate parimutuel pool or pools and shall be distributed as provided by this section.

(b) Each association accepting wagers on an out-of-state or out-of-country race shall deduct a percentage of the amount handled in its conventional and exotic parimutuel pools that is equal to the percentage deducted from the amount handled by the association in its parimutuel pools at its racing meeting.

(c) Each association shall pay a state license fee and make other distributions in accordance with Section 19601.

(d) The amount remaining from the deduction under subdivision (b), after payment of the state license fee and the contractual payment to the out-of-state host racing association, shall be distributed in accordance with applicable provisions of Section 19601.

(e) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for Appaloosa purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the
 association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9.

(f) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for quarter horse purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

(g) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for Arabian purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19616.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, wagers accepted on out-of-state or out-of-country races pursuant to Section 19596 or 19596.2, or on any multiple race exotic wager involving races from out of state that is designated by the board as a national wager and included in the parimutuel pool or pools of the entity conducting the racing shall be distributed as provided in this section.

(b) From the amount handled by the association and included in the parimutuel pool or
 pools of the entity conducting the out-of-state or out-of-country racing, each association may, with the permission of the board, deduct a percentage equal to the percentage deducted by the entity conducting the out-of-state or out-of-country racing.

(c) From the amount deducted pursuant to subdivision (b), if any, each association shall pay a state license fee and make other distributions in accordance with Section 19601.

(d) The amount remaining from the deduction under subdivision (b), if any, after payment of the state license fee and the contractual payment to the out-of-state or out-of-country host racing association, shall be distributed in accordance with the applicable provisions of Section 19601.

(e) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for Appaloosa purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof
 shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.9, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.9.

(f) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for quarter horse purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 19617.7.

(g) For the purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), with respect to any multiple race exotic wager involving races from out of state that is designated by the board as a national wager, the totalizator hub for the wager shall be considered the “entity conducting the racing.”

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a thoroughbred association conducting a racing meeting in this state accepts wagers on a race that is part of a national wager as designated by the board, or acts as the totalizer hub pursuant to subdivision (g), the association shall not be required to pay a license fee to the state on those wagers. Amounts received by the association from the wagering shall be distributed 50 percent as commissions and 50 percent as purses to the horsemen and horsewomen participating in the racing meeting.

(i) From the amount distributed under subdivision (d) for Arabian purses, a sum equal to 13.33 percent thereof shall be held by the association to be deposited with the official registering agency, pursuant to Section 19617.8, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with Section 19617.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19616.2.

(a) Except as provided in Section 19616.1, an association conducting wagering on an out-of-state feature race that is included in the parimutuel pool of the out-of-state entity conducting the out-of-state racing shall deduct a percentage equal to the percentage deducted from the amount handled by the association in its parimutuel pools at its racing meeting.

(b) An association that accepts wagers in a common parimutuel pool on an out-of-state feature race and deducts a
 percentage equal to that deducted from the amount handled by the association in its parimutuel pool at its racing meeting, as specified in subdivision (a), shall calculate payments on winning tickets as provided in Section 19602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 644, Sec. 2.   Effective September 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

19616.51.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and in lieu of any license fee payable to the state prescribed for or referred to in Section 19491, 19491.5, 19596.3, 19601, 19601.2, 19602, 19603, 19604, 19605.25, 19605.35, 19605.45, 19605.6, 19605.7, 19605.71, 19606.5, 19606.6, 19610.8, 19611, 19612, 19614, 19616, 19616.1, 19616.2, or 19641, any association or fair that conducts a racing meeting shall only pay its proportional amount, as determined by the formula devised pursuant to paragraph (1), as a license fee to the state, to be deposited into the Horse Racing Fund, which is hereby established, to fund the board and the equine drug testing program as follows:

(1) All racing associations
 and fairs including all breeds of racing shall participate in the funding of the board in accordance with a formula devised by the board in consultation with the industry.

(2) The baseline funding for the board and equine drug testing program in the first fiscal year after the enactment of this section shall be the amount approved in the 2008–09 Budget Act.

(3) Adjustments to the funding in subsequent budget years may only be made by an act of the Legislature.

(b) The license fee reductions resulting from subdivision (a), after payments to fund the board and the equine drug testing program, shall be distributed as follows:

(1) For thoroughbred racing only, 3 percent of the amount of the reduction shall be deposited with the official registering agency
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19617.2, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 19617.2. The remaining amount shall be distributed to the association that conducts the racing meeting and to horsemen participating in that racing meeting as follows:

(A) Fifty percent to the association as commissions.

(B) Fifty percent to the horsemen as purses.

(2) For quarter horse racing, 3 percent of the amount of the reduction shall be deposited with the official registering agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.7, and shall thereafter be distributed in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 19617.7, the remaining amount shall be distributed to the association that conducts the racing meeting and to horsemen participating in that
 racing meeting as follows:

(A) Fifty percent to the association as commissions.

(B) Fifty percent to the horsemen as purses.

(3) For harness racing, 6 percent of the amount of the reduction shall be distributed as specified in Section 19617.6, the remaining amount shall be distributed to the association that conducts the racing meeting and to horsemen participating in that racing meeting as follows:

(A) Fifty percent to the association as commissions.

(B) Fifty percent to the horsemen as purses.

(4) For all other breeds, the remaining amount shall be distributed to the association that conducts the racing meeting and to
 horsemen participating in that racing meeting as follows:

(A) Fifty percent to the association as commissions.

(B) Fifty percent to the horsemen as purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 193, Sec. 1.   (AB 1792)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this section and Section 19617.2:

(a) “Breeder” means a person who is registered as a breeder of a California-bred thoroughbred with the official registering agency and is named on the applicable Certificate of Registration issued by the Jockey Club of New York.

(b) “Qualifying race” means the following:

(1) In the case of breeder awards, all races in this state, all graded stakes races conducted within the United States, and other stakes races as designated by the official registering agency.

(2) As qualified by paragraph (5), in the case of owner premiums, certain claiming races, as defined by paragraph (4), and all allowance races, including maiden special weights. No owner premiums shall be paid on California-bred restricted races pursuant to Section 19568.

(3) As qualified by paragraph (5), in the case of stallion awards, all nonclaiming races and certain claiming races, if the nonclaiming races and the certain claiming races are conducted in this state during racing meetings where more than one-half of the races on every racing program are for thoroughbreds, all graded stakes races conducted within the United States, and other stakes races as designated by the official registering agency.

(4) “Certain claiming races” means thoroughbred races in the central and southern zone with a minimum claiming level of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for winners
 and thoroughbred races in the northern zone with a minimum claiming level of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for winners.

(5) No owner premium or stallion award shall be paid on races with purses of less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). In determining whether a race complies with the definition in paragraph (4), the official registering agency shall base its determination on the actual amount of the purse at the time the race was conducted and shall not take into consideration any postrace adjustments to that purse.

(c) “Eligible earnings” means the following:

(1) In the case of breeder awards, the annual amount earned by a California-bred thoroughbred for finishing first, second, or third in qualifying races.

(2) In the case of owner
 premiums, the annual amount earned by a California-bred thoroughbred for winning qualifying races.

(3) In order for earnings from a qualifying race to be considered as eligible earnings, a California-bred thoroughbred shall be registered as such with the official registering agency before the date entries were taken by the association for the qualifying race in which that horse earned purse money.

(4) In the case of stallion awards, the annual amount earned by California-conceived or California-bred foals of an eligible thoroughbred stallion in winning qualifying races plus the amount earned by those foals for finishing second or third in a stakes race in this state, for finishing first, second, or third in a graded stakes race within the United States, and for finishing first, second, or third in other stakes races as designated by the official registering agency.

(5) For purposes of this section, the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race within this state shall be three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($330,000) for a win, one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) for a second, and ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) for a third place finish and the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race outside of this state shall be one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000) for a win, sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for a second, and forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) for a third place finish.

(6) In determining the purse earned in any qualifying race that is a stakes race, the amount earned shall be based solely on the added money, with no consideration to be given to other sources of the purse, such as nomination, entry, or starting fees, bonuses, and sponsor contributions, or any combination thereof.

(7) On or before February 15 of any year, it is the ultimate responsibility of the stallion owner to advise the official registering agency of any and all purses earned during the preceding year that shall be considered in determining the amount of the stallion award to which the owner is entitled.

(8) On or before February 15 of any year, it is the ultimate responsibility of the breeder to advise the official registering agency of any and all purses earned during the preceding year in graded stakes races outside of this state by horses bred by breeder.

(d) “Eligible thoroughbred stallion” means a thoroughbred stallion that was continuously present in this state from February 1 to June 15, inclusive, of the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, and if the sire left this state after June 15 of the
 calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, the sire returned to and was present in this state by February 1 of the following calendar year and thereafter remained until June 15 of that year. If a sire dies in this state and stood his last season at stud in this state, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible thoroughbred stallion.

(1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a thoroughbred stallion shall be considered an eligible thoroughbred stallion only if its owner has filed a claim for stallion award on or before February 15 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed and is registered with the official registering agency.

(2) The official registering agency shall establish procedures for the registration of stallions and may charge a fee for that registration.

(3) This subdivision shall apply only to thoroughbred stallions standing at stud in this state before January 1, 2010, and as to foals conceived in this state before January 1, 2010.

(e) “Eligible thoroughbred stallion” means a thoroughbred stallion that was continuously present in this state from February 1 to June 15, inclusive, of the year 2010 or any subsequent calendar year in which he stood at stud and fathered the participant in the race. If a sire dies in this state in the year 2010 or any subsequent year and stood his last season at stud in this state, or was standing at stud in this state on the date of his death in the year 2010 or any subsequent year, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible thoroughbred stallion regarding a race participant fathered by him in that season.(1) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a
 thoroughbred stallion shall be considered an eligible thoroughbred stallion only if the stallion owner has filed a claim for stallion award on or before February 15 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed and the stallion and the stallion owner are registered with the official registering agency.

(2) The official registering agency shall establish procedures for the registration of stallions and stallion owners and may charge a fee for that registration.

(3) This subdivision shall apply only to thoroughbred stallions standing at stud in this state on or after January 1, 2010, and as to foals conceived in this state on or after January 1, 2010.

(f) “Official registering agency” means the California Thoroughbred Breeders Association.

(g) “Owner” means the
 person who is registered with the paymaster of purses on the date the qualifying race was conducted as the owner of the California-bred thoroughbred earning purse money in that race.

(h) “Quotient,” for any fund, means the amount allocated to that fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19617.2 divided by the aggregate eligible earnings of the horses applicable to that fund. In calculating the quotient for each of the funds, any retroactive purse payments with respect to a race shall not be considered after the disbursement of the fund.

(i) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible thoroughbred stallion as of December 31 of the calendar year in which that sire’s foals had eligible earnings or the person who owned the eligible thoroughbred sire on the date that the stallion died. This subdivision shall only apply to thoroughbred stallions standing at
 stud in this state before January 1, 2010, and as to foals conceived in this state before January 1, 2010.

(j) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible thoroughbred stallion as of December 31 of each calendar year in which the eligible thoroughbred stallion stands at stud in this state as to all of that sire’s foals (1) that were conceived in this state in that calendar year and (2) that thereafter have eligible earnings. If the eligible thoroughbred stallion dies prior to December 31 of a year in which that stallion stands at stud in this state, the person who owned the eligible thoroughbred stallion on the date that the stallion died shall be the stallion owner for that year. This subdivision shall only apply to thoroughbred stallions standing at stud in this state on or after January 1, 2010, and as to foals conceived in this state on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 272, Sec. 4.   (AB 2792)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any association conducting a race meeting that includes thoroughbred racing shall deposit with the official registering agency 0.54 percent of the total amount handled ontrack in daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools resulting from thoroughbred wagers made in this state. These deposits shall be made at the following intervals:

(1) For any meeting of 20 racing days or less, the requisite deposit shall be made not later than seven days immediately following the last day of that meeting.

(2) For any meeting of more than 20 racing days, the initial deposit shall be made not later than 27 racing days
 after the commencement of that meeting and every 20 racing days thereafter, with a final deposit made not later than seven days following the last day of that meeting. The initial deposit for that meeting shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the first 20 racing days of the meeting, and deposits thereafter shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the ensuing periods of 20 racing days with the last deposit being based upon the applicable amount handled from the end of the last 20-racing-day period for which a deposit has been made to the end of the meeting.

(b) After deducting a sum equal to 5 percent of the total deposits made pursuant to subdivision (a) and the total deposits made pursuant to Section 19602, the amount to compensate the official registering agency for its administrative cost and for expenses it incurs for educational, promotional, and research programs, the official registering agency shall
 for computational purposes distribute annually the balance of the deposits in the following manner:

(1) To the California-bred race fund, 10 percent to be used for the promotion of California-bred races and from which purses are to be provided or supplemented for California Cup Day, other California-bred races, and, upon the approval of the official registering agency, races featuring California-breds. This fund shall be administered by the official registering agency. Any funds not used for those purposes during any year, up to 1 percent of the total breeder, stallion, and owner award receipts, shall remain in the California-bred race fund to be distributed for the purposes of this paragraph the following year. Any funds remaining thereafter shall be redistributed to augment the funds referred to in subdivision (c), and shall be allocated to the breeder fund and to the stallion fund as provided in that subdivision. It is the intent of the
 Legislature that all funds used for purses shall supplement and not supplant existing purses for California-breds.

(2) To the owner fund for the purpose of owner premiums pursuant to Section 19614.4.

(3) To the California-bred bonus program, 15 percent of the amount remaining to be used for the payment of bonuses to California-bred horses in maiden allowance races in California. This bonus program shall be administered by the official registering agency.

(c) The funds remaining after the distributions made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be distributed as follows:

(1) To the breeder fund 75 percent, from which breeder awards are to be paid.

(2) To the stallion fund 25 percent, from which
 stallion awards are to be paid.

(d) The official registering agency shall make the following payments to the owner, breeder, and stallion owner so as to encourage agriculture and the breeding of higher quality horses in this state:

(1) The owner shall be paid an owner premium pursuant to Section 19614.4.

(2) The breeder shall be paid a breeder award equal to the quotient for the breeder fund multiplied by the eligible earnings of the horse bred by the breeder.

(3) The stallion owner shall be paid a stallion award equal to the quotient for the stallion fund multiplied by the eligible earnings of the stallion owner’s eligible thoroughbred stallion.

(4) Owner premiums for California-bred
 horses shall be listed in the racing program alongside the advertised purse, and shall be distributed to the owner pursuant to Section 19614.4 at the same time as the purse.

(5) The breeder and stallion awards shall be paid not later than March 31 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards or premiums were earned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 272, Sec. 5.   (AB 2792)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19617.3.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Breeder” means a person who is registered as the breeder of a California-bred paint horse with the official registering agency and is named on the applicable Certificate of Registration issued by the American Paint Horse Association.

(2) “Eligible earnings” means the following:

(A) In the case of breeder premiums, the annual amount earned by a California-bred paint horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(B) In the case of owners’ awards, the annual amount earned by a California-bred paint horse for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(C) In the case of stallion awards, the annual amount earned by California-conceived or California-bred foals of an eligible paint horse sire for finishing first or second in qualifying races.

(D) In order for earnings from a qualifying race to be considered as eligible earnings, a California-bred paint horse shall be registered as such with the official registering agency before the entries were taken by the association for the qualifying race in which that horse earned purse money.

(E) For purposes of this paragraph, the maximum purse considered earned in any qualifying race within this state is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a win, and eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) for a second place finish.

(F) In determining the purse earned in any qualifying race that is a stakes race, the amount earned shall be based on the added money and other sources of the purse, such as nomination, entry, or starting fees, bonuses, and sponsor contributions, or any combination thereof.

(G) On or before February 1, of any year, the stallion owner shall verify with the official registering agency the eligibility of a stallion to receive the stallion award to which the owner is entitled.

(3) “Eligible paint horse sire” means a paint horse,
 thoroughbred, or quarter horse sire of a registered paint horse foal, where the sire was continuously present in this state from February 1 to July 15, inclusive, of the calendar year in which the qualifying race was conducted, as well as from February 1 to July 15, inclusive, of the following calendar year. If a sire dies in this state and stood his last seasons at stud in this state, he shall thereafter continue to be considered an eligible paint horse sire. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a paint horse stallion shall be considered an eligible paint horse sire only if its owner has verified the stallion’s eligibility with the official registering agency for stallion awards on or before February 1 of the calendar year immediately following the calendar year for which the awards are being distributed.

(4) “Official registering agency” means the Pacific Coast Quarter Horse Racing Association.

(5) “Owner” means the person who is registered with the paymaster of purses on the date the qualifying race was conducted as the owner of the California-bred paint horse earning purse money in that race.

(6) “Qualifying race” means all paint horse only races in this state.

(7) “Stallion owner” means the person who is the owner of the eligible paint horse sire as of December 31 of the calendar year in which that sire’s foals had eligible earnings or the person who owned the eligible paint horse sire on the date that the sire died.

(b) Any association conducting a race meeting that includes paint horse racing shall deposit with the official registering agency 0.2 of 1 percent of the total amount handled ontrack, and 0.4 of 1 percent of the total amount
 handled offtrack, in daily conventional and exotic parimutuel pools and a sum equal to 25 percent of those funds specified for purses in Sections 19612.1, 19612.2, 19614.2, 19616, and 19616.1 and the sums specified in Sections 19567 and 19617.5, resulting from paint horse racing. The deposits shall be made at the following intervals:

(1) For any meeting of 20 racing days or less, the requisite deposit shall be made not later than seven days immediately following the last day of that meeting.

(2) For any meeting of more than 20 racing days, the initial deposit shall be made not later than 27 racing days after the commencement of that meeting and every 20 racing days thereafter, with a final deposit made not later than seven days following the last day of that meeting. The initial deposit for that meeting shall be based upon the applicable amount handled during the first 20 racing